dix/consistent-monA.dix
    <pardef n="du__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>cent</l> 
        <r><b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>mil</l> 
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>cent</l> 
        <r><b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>mil</l> 
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>cent</l> 
        <r><b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>mil</l> 
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>oj</l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>on</l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ojn</l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="million__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dudek__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>unu</l> 
        <r><b/>unu</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>du</l> 
        <r><b/>du</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>tri</l> 
        <r><b/>tri</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>kvar</l> 
        <r><b/>kvar</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>kvin</l> 
        <r><b/>kvin</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>ses</l> 
        <r><b/>ses</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>sep</l> 
        <r><b/>sep</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>ok</l> 
        <r><b/>ok</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>naŭ</l> 
        <r><b/>naŭ</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ha/ve__vbmod">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ve</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ve</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>d</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>d</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ving</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ving</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ving</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="want__vbmod">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="will/__vbmod">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="c/an__vbmod">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an</l> 
        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>an</l> 
        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ould</l> 
        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/be_able_to__vbmod">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>be<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>are<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>am<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>is<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>was<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>was<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>were<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>been<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ha/ve__vbhaver">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ve</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ve</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>d</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>d</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ving</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ving</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ving</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="nulo">
        <i>nulo</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="du">
        <i>du</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tri">
        <i>tri</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kvar">
        <i>kvar</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kvin">
        <i>kvin</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ses">
        <i>ses</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sep">
        <i>sep</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ok">
        <i>ok</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="naŭ">
        <i>naŭ</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dek">
        <i>dek</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="cent">
        <i>cent</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mil">
        <i>mil</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dekunu">
        <i>dekunu</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dekdu">
        <i>dekdu</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dektri">
        <i>dektri</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dekkvar">
        <i>dekkvar</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dekkvin">
        <i>dekkvin</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dekses">
        <i>dekses</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="deksep">
        <i>deksep</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dekok">
        <i>dekok</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="deknaŭ">
        <i>deknaŭ</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dudek">
        <i>dudek</i> 
        <par n="dudek__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tridek">
        <i>tridek</i> 
        <par n="dudek__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kvardek">
        <i>kvardek</i> 
        <par n="dudek__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kvindek">
        <i>kvindek</i> 
        <par n="dudek__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sesdek">
        <i>sesdek</i> 
        <par n="dudek__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sepdek">
        <i>sepdek</i> 
        <par n="dudek__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="okdek">
        <i>okdek</i> 
        <par n="dudek__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="naŭdek">
        <i>naŭdek</i> 
        <par n="dudek__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="miliono">
        <i>miliono</i> 
        <par n="du__num" /> 
    </e>
